Maryland, session 2025, HB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–101.
(a) In this title:
(1) except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the definitions in §
1–101 of this article apply without exception or variation; and
(2) the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Board” means the Board of License Commissioners for Baltimore City.
12–209.
The Mayor and City Council shall:

HOUSE BILL 1293 3
(1) pay from the general fund of the City that includes revenue from the
Board the salaries and expenses of the Board and its employees; and
(2) devote the balance of the revenue from the Board to the general purposes
of the City.
12–2605.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UNIT” MEANS THE NEIGHBORHOOD SERVICES UNIT
WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE SHERIFF OF BALTIMORE CITY, AS ESTABLISHED
UNDER § 2–316.1 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE.
(B) THE BOARD SHALL WORK IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE UNIT TO
ENFORCE THIS TITLE.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING
WITH THE UNIT THAT SPECIFIES:
(1) THE RESPECTIVE ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE PARTIES
IN CONNECTION WITH THE PARTNERSHIP DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–209 OF THIS TITLE, THE FUNDING
SOURCE FOR THE UNIT.
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–316.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE BOARD OF LICENSE COMMISSIONERS OF
BALTIMORE CITY.
(3) “UNIT” MEANS THE NEIGHBORHOOD SERVICES UNIT WITHIN THE
OFFICE OF THE SHERIFF OF BALTIMORE CITY, AS ESTABLISHED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(B) THERE IS A NEIGHBORHOOD SERVICES UNIT WITHIN THE OFFICE OF
THE SHERIFF OF BALTIMORE CITY.
(C) THE UNIT SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 1293
(1) WORK IN PARTNERSHIP WITH THE BOARD TO ENFORCE THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES LAWS OF BALTIMORE CITY UNDER TITLE 12 OF THE
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) PERFORM ANY OTHER DUTIES AS DIRECTED BY THE SHERIFF OF
BALTIMORE CITY.
(D) THE UNIT SHALL ENTER INTO A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING
WITH THE BOARD THAT SPECIFIES THE:
(1) THE RESPECTIVE ROLES AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE PARTIES
IN CONNECTION WITH THE PARTNERSHIP DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–209 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES
AND CANNABIS ARTICLE, THE FUNDING SOURCE FOR THE UNIT.
7–301.
(c) (1) The filing fees and costs in a civil case are those prescribed by law
subject to modification by law, rule, or administrative regulation.
(2) The Chief Judge of the District Court shall assess a surcharge that:
(i) May not be more than:
1. $43 per summary ejectment case; and
2. $28 per case for all other civil cases; and
(ii) Shall be deposited:
1. For a surcharge assessed under item (i)1 of this
paragraph:
A. 45% into the Statewide Rental Assistance Voucher
Program established under § 4–2902 of the Housing and Community Development Article;
B. 45% into the Maryland Legal Services Corporation Fund
established under § 11–402 of the Human Services Article; and
C. 10% into the Rental Assistance for Community Schools
Families Fund established under § 9.9–104.1 of the Education Article; and

HOUSE BILL 1293 5
2. For a surcharge assessed under item (i)2 of this
paragraph, into the Maryland Legal Services Corporation Fund established under §
11–402 of the Human Services Article.
(3) (i) In addition to the surcharge assessed under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, the Chief Judge of the District Court shall assess a surcharge that may not be
more than $10 per case for the following cases filed in Baltimore City:
1. Summary ejectment;
2. Tenant holding over;
3. Breach of lease; and
4. Warrant of restitution.
(ii) The revenue generated from the surcharge on filing fees collected
by the District Court in Baltimore City under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be:
1. Remitted quarterly to the Baltimore City Director of
Finance; and
2. Used to fund the enhancement of sheriff benefits [and],
the increase in sheriff personnel to enhance the service of domestic violence orders, AND
THE WORK OF THE NEIGHBORHOOD SERVICES UNIT WITHIN THE OFFICE OF THE
SHERIFF OF BALTIMORE CITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.